Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB899.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 456.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Dating relationship" means a relationship between individuals who have or have
had a relationship of a romantic or intimate nature. It does not include a casual
acquaintanceship or ordinary fraternization in a business or social context. The
following factors may be considered in addition to any other relevant factors in
determining whether the relationship is or was of a romantic or intimate nature:
(a) Declarations of romantic interest;
(b) The relationship was characterized by the expectation of affection;
(c) Attendance at social outings together as a couple;
(d) The frequency and type of interaction between the persons, including whether
the persons have been involved together over time and on a continuous basis
during the course of the relationship;
(e) The length and recency of the relationship; and
(f) Other indications of a substantial connection that would lead a reasonable
person to understand that a dating relationship existed;
(2) "Dating violence and abuse" means:
(a) Physical injury, serious physical injury, stalking, sexual assault, strangulation,
or the infliction of fear of imminent physical injury, serious physical injury,
sexual abuse, strangulation, or assault occurring between persons who are or
have been in a dating relationship; or
(b) Any conduct prohibited by KRS 525.125, 525.130, 525.135, or 525.137, or
the infliction of fear of such imminent conduct, taken against a domestic
animal when used as a method of coercion, control, punishment, intimidation,
or revenge directed against a person with whom the perpetrator is or has been
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2171
in a dating relationship, when that person has a close bond of affection to the
domestic animal;
(3) "Domestic animal" means a dog, cat, or other animal that is domesticated and kept
as a household pet, but does not include animals normally raised for agricultural or
commercial purposes;
(4) "Foreign protective order" means any judgment, decree, or order of protection
which is entitled to full faith and credit pursuant to 18 U.S.C. sec. 2265 which was
not issued on the basis of domestic violence and abuse;
(5) "Global positioning monitoring system" means a system that electronically
determines a person's location through a device worn by the person which does not
invade his or her bodily integrity and which transmits the person's latitude and
longitude data to a monitoring entity;
(6) "Order of protection" means any interpersonal protective order, including those
issued on a temporary basis, and includes a foreign protective order;
(7) "School violence" means serious physical injury or the infliction of fear of
imminent serious physical injury occurring:
(a) On or in any property that is owned, operated, leased, or contracted for use
by a local board of education; and
(b) Between persons who are students;
(8) "Sexual assault" refers to conduct prohibited as any degree of rape, sodomy, or
sexual abuse under KRS Chapter 510 or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation,
or solicitation to commit any degree of rape, sodomy, or sexual abuse, or incest
under KRS 530.020;
(9)[(8)] "Stalking" refers to conduct prohibited as stalking under KRS 508.140 or
508.150, or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the
crime of stalking;
(10)[(9)] "Strangulation" refers to conduct prohibited by KRS 508.170 and 508.175, or
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2171
a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the crime of
strangulation; and
(11)[(10)] "Substantial violation" means criminal conduct which involves actual or
threatened harm to the person, family, or property, including a domestic animal, of
an individual protected by an order of protection.
Section 2. KRS 456.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A petition for an interpersonal protective order may be filed by:
(a) A victim of dating violence and abuse;
(b) A victim of stalking;
(c) A victim of sexual assault;[ or]
(d) A victim of school violence; or
(e) An adult on behalf of a victim who is a minor otherwise qualifying for relief
under this subsection.
(2) The petition may be filed in the victim's county of residence or a county where the
victim has fled to escape dating violence and abuse, stalking, [or ]sexual assault, or
school violence.
(3) The petition shall be verified and contain:
(a) The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary
institution of the petitioner;
(b) The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary
institution of the person or persons who have engaged in the alleged act or
acts complained of in the petition;
(c) The facts and circumstances which constitute the basis for the petition; and
(d) The names, ages, and addresses of the petitioner's minor children, if
applicable.
(4) The petition shall be filed on forms prescribed by the Administrative Office of the
Courts and provided to the person seeking relief by the circuit clerk or by another
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2171
individual authorized by the court to provide and verify petitions in emergency
situations, such as law enforcement officers, Commonwealth's or county attorneys,
and regional rape crisis centers or domestic violence shelters.
(5) All petitions requested, completed, and signed by persons seeking protection under
this chapter shall be accepted and filed with the court.
(6) (a) Jurisdiction over petitions filed under this chapter shall be concurrent between
the District Court and Circuit Court.
(b) The Court of Justice shall provide a protocol for twenty-four (24) hour access
to interpersonal protective orders in each county with any protocol, whether
statewide or local, being subject to Supreme Court review and approval of the
initial protocol and any subsequent amendments. This protocol may allow for
petitions to be filed in or transferred to a court other than those specified in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The Court of Justice may authorize by rule that petitions in a specific county
be filed in accordance with a supplemental jurisdictional protocol adopted for
that county. This protocol may provide for petitions to be filed in or
transferred to a court other than those specified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(d) 1. In addition to the protocols for twenty-four (24) hour access established
under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, [before January 1, 2019,
]the Court of Justice shall provide protocols for filing, including
electronic filing, of petitions for orders of protection at those regional
rape crisis centers designated under KRS 211.600, or regional domestic
violence shelters designated under KRS 209A.045, that elect to
participate in any county's twenty-four (24) hour access protocol.
2. These protocols shall be subject to Supreme Court review for approval
of the initial protocol and any subsequent amendments.
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2171
(7) Any judge to whom a petition is referred under subsection (6) of this section shall
have full authority to review and hear a petition and subsequently grant and enforce
an interpersonal protective order.
(8) If the judge of a court in which there is a pending request for modification or
enforcement of an existing order of protection is unavailable or unable to act within
a reasonable time, the proceedings may be conducted by any judge of the county in
accordance with court rules.
Section 3. KRS 456.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any petition filed under KRS 456.030 on behalf of a minor who is an alleged
victim of dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, [or ]stalking, or school violence
or in which a minor is named as a respondent or petitioner, shall comply with the
requirements in that section and shall:
(a) Proceed in accordance with the procedural safeguards under KRS 610.070;
and
(b) Conform to the confidentiality provisions under KRS 610.340.
(2) If the court orders an evidentiary hearing under KRS 456.040(1)(a), a guardian ad
litem shall be appointed for any unrepresented minor who is a respondent to the
action or a petitioner who is an alleged victim of dating violence and abuse, sexual
assault, [or ]stalking, or school violence. The guardian ad litem shall be paid a fee
fixed by the court not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), which shall be paid by
the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(3) Violation of the terms or conditions of an order of protection issued under KRS
456.060 after the person has been served or given notice of the order shall
constitute contempt of court and may constitute a criminal offense pursuant to KRS
456.180 if the offender is an adult or a public offense under KRS 600.020(51) if the
offender is a juvenile. Once a juvenile action or contempt proceeding has been
initiated, the other shall not be undertaken regardless of the outcome of the original
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2171
proceeding.
(4) Nothing in subsection (3) of this section shall preclude the Commonwealth from
proceeding, or the petitioner from pursuing charges, against the minor respondent
for offenses other than a violation of an order of protection. Proceedings against a
minor respondent for offenses other than a violation of an order of protection shall
proceed:
(a) In the juvenile session of District Court; and
(b) In accordance with the procedural and statutory provisions established for the
juvenile session of District Court.
Section 4. KRS 456.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The court shall review a petition for an interpersonal protective order
immediately upon its filing. If the review indicates that dating violence and
abuse, stalking, [or ]sexual assault, or school violence exists, the court shall
issue a summons the parties to an evidentiary hearing not more than fourteen
(14) days in the future. If the review indicates that [such ]a basis does not
exist, the court may consider an amended petition or dismiss the petition
without prejudice.
(b) Service of the summons and hearing order under this subsection shall be made
upon the adverse party personally and may be made in the manner and by the
persons authorized to serve subpoenas under Rule 45.03 of the Rules of Civil
Procedure. A summons may be reissued if service has not been made on the
adverse party by the fixed court date and time.
(2) (a) If the review under this section also indicates the presence of an immediate
and present danger of dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, [or ]stalking,
or school violence, the court shall, upon the filing of the petition, issue ex
parte a temporary interpersonal protective order that:
1. Authorizes relief appropriate to the situation utilizing the alternatives
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2171
under[set out in] KRS 456.060;
2. Sets forth which communications, if any, as requested by the petitioner,
are authorized and which communications are unauthorized;
3. Expires upon the conclusion of the evidentiary hearing required by this
section unless extended or withdrawn by subsequent order of the court;
and
4. Does not order or refer the parties to mediation unless requested by the
petitioner, and the court finds that:
a. The petitioner's request is voluntary and not the result of coercion;
and
b. Mediation is a realistic and viable alternative to or adjunct to the
issuance of an order sought by the petitioner.
[Nothing in ]This paragraph shall not be interpreted to place any restriction or
restraint on the petitioner.
(b) If an order is not issued under this subsection, the court shall note on the
petition, for the record, any action taken or denied and the reason for it.
Section 5. KRS 456.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Following a hearing ordered under KRS 456.040, if a court finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, [or
]stalking, or school violence has occurred and may again occur, the court may issue
an interpersonal protective order:
(a) Restraining the adverse party from:
1. Committing further acts of dating violence and abuse, stalking, [or
]sexual assault, or school violence;
2. Any unauthorized contact or communication with the petitioner or other
person specified by the court;
3. Approaching the petitioner or other person specified by the court within
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2171
a distance specified in the order, not to exceed five hundred (500) feet;
4. Going to or within a specified distance of a specifically described
residence, school, or place of employment or area where such a place is
located; and
5. Disposing of or damaging any of the property of the parties;
(b) Authorizing, at the request of the petitioner:
1. Limited contact or communication between the parties that the court
finds necessary; or
2. The parties to remain in a common area, which may necessitate them
being closer than five hundred (500) feet under limited circumstances
with specific parameters set forth by the court.
[Nothing in ]This paragraph shall not be interpreted to place any restriction or
restraint on the petitioner;
(c) Directing or prohibiting any other actions that the court believes will assist[be
of assistance] in eliminating future acts of dating violence and abuse, stalking,
[or ]sexual assault, or school violence, except that the court shall not order the
petitioner to take any affirmative action;
(d) Directing that either or both of the parties receive counseling services
available in the community in dating violence and abuse cases; and
(e) Awarding possession of any shared domestic animal to the petitioner.
(2) In imposing a location restriction described in subsection (1)(a)4. of this section, the
court shall:
(a) Afford the petitioner and respondent, if present, an opportunity to testify on
the issue of the locations and areas from which the respondent should or
should not be excluded;
(b) Only impose a location restriction where there is a specific, demonstrable
danger to the petitioner or other person protected by the order;
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2171
(c) Specifically describe in the order the locations or areas prohibited to the
respondent; and
(d) Consider structuring a restriction [so as ]to allow the respondent transit
through an area if the respondent does not interrupt his or her travel to harass,
harm, or attempt to harass or harm the petitioner.
(3) An interpersonal protective order shall be effective for a period of time fixed by the
court, not to exceed three (3) years, and may be reissued upon expiration for
subsequent periods of up to three (3) years each. The fact that an order has not been
violated since its issuance may be considered by a court in hearing a request for a
reissuance of the order.
Section 6. KRS 456.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A temporary or ordinary interpersonal protective order shall become effective and
binding on the respondent when the respondent is given notice of the existence and
terms of the order by a peace officer or the court or upon personal service of the
order, whichever is earlier. A peace officer or court giving notice of an unserved
order shall make all reasonable efforts to arrange for the order's personal service
upon the respondent. Once effective, a peace officer or the court may enforce the
order's terms and act immediately upon their violation.
(2) Costs, fees, or bond shall not be assessed against or required of a petitioner for any
filing, hearing, service, or order authorized by or required to implement this
chapter.
(3) A court shall not require mediation, conciliation, or counseling prior to or as a
condition of issuing an interpersonal protective order.
(4) Mutual protective orders may be issued only if:
(a) Separate petitions have been filed by both parties; and
(b) The orders are written with sufficient specificity to allow any peace officer to
identify which party has violated the order.
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2171
(5) Upon proper filing of a motion, either party may seek to amend an interpersonal
protective order.
(6) Testimony offered by an adverse party in a hearing ordered pursuant to KRS
456.040 shall not be admissible in any criminal proceeding involving the same
parties except for purposes of impeachment.
(7) (a) The Court of Justice, county and Commonwealth's attorneys, law enforcement
agencies, and victim services organizations may jointly operate an
interpersonal protective order intake center to assist persons who apply for
relief under this chapter.
(b) In cases where criminal conduct is alleged, a court may suggest that a
petitioner voluntarily contact the county attorney. A court may not withhold
or delay relief if the petitioner elects to not contact the county attorney.
(8) A person's right to apply for relief under this chapter shall not be affected by that
person leaving his or her residence to avoid dating violence and abuse, sexual
assault, [or ]stalking, or school violence.
(9) A court shall order the omission or deletion of the petitioner's address and the
address of any minor children from any orders or documents to be made available
to the public or to any person who engaged in the acts complained of in the petition.
(10) (a) If a petition under this chapter did not result in the issuance of a non-
temporary interpersonal protective order, the court in which the petition was
heard may for good cause shown order the expungement of the records of the
case if:
1. Six (6) months have elapsed since the case was dismissed; and
2. During the six (6) months preceding the expungement request, the
respondent has not been bound by an order of protection issued for the
protection of any person including an order of protection as defined in
KRS 403.720.
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2171
(b) As used in this subsection, "expungement" has the same meaning as in KRS
431.079.
Section 7. KRS 456.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A court issuing an interpersonal protective order shall direct the appropriate law
enforcement agency to assist the petitioner in having the provisions of the order
complied with.
(2) When a law enforcement officer has reason to suspect that a person has been the
victim of dating violence and abuse, sexual assault, [or ]stalking, or school
violence, the officer shall use all reasonable means to provide assistance to the
victim, including but not limited to:
(a) Remaining at the location of the call for assistance so long as the officer
reasonably suspects there is danger to the physical safety of individuals there
without the presence of a law enforcement officer;
(b) Assisting the victim in obtaining medical treatment, including transporting the
victim to the nearest medical facility capable of providing the necessary
treatment;
(c) Advising the victim immediately of the rights available to them, including the
provisions of this chapter; and
(d) Completing a JC-3 form, or its equivalent replacement, and providing the
information to the Criminal Justice Statistical Analysis Center pursuant to
KRS 209A.110.
(3) Orders of protection shall be enforced in any county of the Commonwealth.
(4) Officers acting in good faith under this chapter shall be immune from criminal and
civil liability.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed